lang/common/courses/xfst-lexc/e.xfscript
! Sets

define Vow [a|e|o|u|i|y|æ|ø|å] ;
define Cns [b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|x|z] ;

define Archiphonemes %^C ;
define dummy [ %> | %^C | %^GEM ] ;

! Rules

define gemination r -> [ q q ] || Vow _ Vow  "^GEM" ">" [Cns - q] ;


define vtoZero v -> 0 || u %> _ [a|i] ;
define CvtoCp    v -> p || %^C %> _ ;
define CtoP    %^C -> p || _ %> p ;

define UvularLowering u -> o , i -> e || _ %> [q|r] ;
define Cleanup [dummy -> 0 ] ;


read regex [
    gemination
.o. vtoZero
.o. CvtoCp
.o. CtoP
.o. UvularLowering 
.o. Cleanup
] ;

save stack e.xfst.hfst
